Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.130

Satisfaction of judgment—Filing.

If the prevailing party receives payment of the judgment, the prevailing party shall file a satisfaction of such judgment with all courts in which the judgment was filed. If the prevailing party fails to file proof of satisfaction of the judgment, the party paying the judgment may file such notice with all courts in which the judgment was filed.

[ 2019 c 251 s 7.]